California, session 20252026, SB1162.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4771.7 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 4771.6, to read:4771.7. In order to reduce wildfire hazards and improve both the availability and affordability of homeowners’ insurance, the The department shall, on or before June 30, 2027, and in consultation with the Department of Insurance and the California FAIR Plan Association, make recommendations to prioritize those state efforts to reduce wildfire hazards in the wildland-urban interface identified in the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan for the task force regarding specific wildfire risk reduction measures that would reduce the regional risk profile for high-hazard landscapes and communities, particularly those ZIP codes Codes that have seen the largest increases in FAIR Plan policies, as established in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10090) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, sold since 2019.